Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
353B

INTERSTATE
COMPACT FOR THE SUPERVISION OF ADULT OFFENDERS

Section

353B-1 Terms and provisions of compact

353B-2 State compact administrator

353B-3 State council for interstate adult
offender

supervision

353B-4 Expenditures

353B-5 Execution

353B-6 Interstate transfer fee

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next